Massachusetts, session 194th, H758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of the Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “appropriate” in line 5 the
following:-
a1/4 “Dental Services, all dental services including dentures, restorative, endodontic, and
periodontal treatment.”
SECTION 2. Section 53 of Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph: -
of 2

“The division shall include within its covered services for adults who are ages 65 and
older all federally optional services that were included in its state plan or demonstration program
in effect on January 1, 2002, including all dental services. Covered services for adults in the
MassHealth Essential program shall include dental services to the same extent as such services
were covered for adults in the MassHealth Basic program as of January 1, 2002.”
of 2